Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 12

Subdistricts

69-5-1201. General provisions.

Any person, who owns lands within any drainage district, and who desires to establish a subdistrict within the limits of the original district for the purpose of securing more complete drainage, may file a petition with the county clerk, asking the county court to establish such subdistrict, and describing the lands to be affected by the subdistrict so as to convey an intelligible description of such lands. The bond and all other proceedings shall be the same as provided in parts 1-11 of this chapter for the establishment, formation, and construction of original districts and improvements of districts, including the assessment of damages and assessment of benefits.

When established and constructed, it shall be and become a part of the drainage system of such drainage district, and be under the control and supervision of the board of directors of such drainage district.

The subdistrict shall only be established when conducive to the public health or welfare, or to the public benefit or utility.

Any special assessments made for the benefit of such subdistrict shall be secondary in lien and in right to the assessments for the benefit of the original district.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 26; Shan., § 3871a106; Code 1932, § 4334; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1601; T.C.A. §69-6-1201.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Cross-References. Circuit court defined, §69-5-102.